New Jersey, session 221, S2831.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    The adoption of a tuition or fee schedule by the governing board of a public institution of higher education for the ensuing academic year pursuant to subsection c. of section 6 of P.L.1994, c.48 (C.18A:3B-6) or any other section of law, shall take place after the release of the Governors recommended budget and during the Spring semester. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.